Arkansas, session 2025, HB1909.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Public Services Only
for Citizens Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 76, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 9 — Citizenship and Residency Verification

20-76-901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Federal public benefit" means the same as defined in 8
U.S.C. § 1611(c), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(B) "Federal public benefit" does not include a benefit
*CRH308*
03/24/2025 10:12:32 AM CRH308

HB1909
listed in 8 U.S.C. § 1611(b), as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(2) "Political subdivision" means:
(A) A local governmental entity, including without
limitation a municipality, metropolitan government, county, utility district,
school district, public building authority, or development district, created
and existing under the laws of this state; or
(B) An instrumentality of government created by one (1) or
more of the local governmental entities named under subdivision (2)(A) of
this section;
(3) "State agency" means any agency, department, board,
commission, or other body that carries out state functions and programs; and
(4)(A) "State or local public benefit" means the same as defined
in 8 U.S.C. § 1621(c), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(B) "State or local public benefit" does not include a
benefit listed in 8 U.S.C. § 1621(b), as it existed on January 1, 2025.

20-76-902. Verification of citizenship of applicants.
(a) Except if prohibited by federal law, a state agency or political
subdivision shall verify that each applicant who is eighteen (18) years of
age or older who applies for a federal public benefit or a state or local
public benefit from the state agency or political subdivision:
(A) Is a United States citizen; and
(B) Resides in this state as provided in this subchapter.
(b)(1) A state agency or political subdivision shall include on all
electronic or other forms and on all automated phone systems a written or
verbal statement:
(A) Requiring an applicant for a federal public benefit or
a state or local public benefit to attest to the applicant's status as a
United States citizen under penalty of perjury; and
(B) Describing the penalties for violations of this
subchapter.
(2) Subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be implemented upon
the state agency's or political subdivision's first reprinting of applicable
forms or updating of the electronic or automated phone systems.
(c) For an applicant who claims United States citizenship, the state
agency or political subdivision shall make every reasonable effort to
03/24/2025 10:12:32 AM CRH308

HB1909
ascertain verification of the applicant's citizenship, including without
limitation requesting the applicant present one (1) of the following:
(1) A state or United-States-territory-issued certified birth
certificate;
(2) A Certification of Birth Abroad of a Citizen of the United
States;
(3) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad of a United States
Citizen;
(4) A Certificate of Naturalization; or
(5) A successor document of the documents under subdivisions
(c)(1)—(c)(4) of this section.
(d) A state agency or political subdivision shall maintain a copy of
all documentation submitted by an applicant under this subchapter for
verification in a manner consistent with the state agency's or political
subdivision's rules or policies governing storage or preservation of
documentation.
(e) For an applicant who claims to reside in this state, the state
agency or political subdivision shall make every reasonable effort to
ascertain verification of the applicant's residency, including without
limitation requesting the applicant present one (1) of the following:
(1) A utility bill in the applicant's name from at least six (6)
months before the application;
(2) A bank statement in the applicant's name from at least six
(6) months before the application;
(3) An Arkansas driver's license issued in the six (6) months
before the application; or
(4) A state-issued identification card issued in the six (6)
months before the application.
(f)(1)(A) A document submitted under subsection (c) of this section
shall be presumed to be proof of an applicant's eligibility under this
subchapter until a final verification is received by the state agency or
political subdivision.
(B) A state agency or political subdivision shall not
delay the distribution of a federal public benefit or state or local benefit
based solely on the pendency of final verification.
(2) Upon receipt of a final verification that indicates that the
03/24/2025 10:12:32 AM CRH308

HB1909
applicant is not a United States citizen, the state agency or political
subdivision shall:
(A) Terminate any recurring federal public benefit and
state or local benefit; and
(B) Pursue any applicable action against the applicant.
(g) The verification required by this section shall be enforced
without regard to race, religion, gender, ethnicity, or national origin.
(h) Verification provided under this subchapter shall be reconsidered
by a state agency or political subdivision as frequently as the state agency
or political subdivision deem necessary.

20-76-903. Penalties.
(a)(1) A state or local public benefit or a federal public benefit
that is provided to an individual who is not a United States citizen is
recoverable by the state as a debt due the state.
(2) An individual who receives a state or local benefit or a
federal public benefit who is not a United States citizen shall be prosecuted
for theft of public benefits under § 5-36-202.
(b) If an individual withholds or falsifies information that may
result in the withdrawal of a federal public benefit or a state or local
public benefit due to the individual’s status as a non-citizen of the United
States, then the individual may be prosecuted for any offense he or she
committed.
(c)(1) A state agency or political subdivision shall close an
individual's open case for a federal public benefit or a state or local
public benefit upon a judicial order or administrative determination that the
individual is not a United States citizen.
(2)(A) A case closed under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall remain closed.
(B) An individual whose case is closed under subdivision
(c)(1) of this section shall remain ineligible to receive a federal public
benefit or a state or local public benefit.

20-76-904. Reporting.
A state agency or political subdivision that provides federal public
benefits or state and local public benefits shall report annually at the end
03/24/2025 10:12:32 AM CRH308

HB1909
of the fiscal year to the Legislative Council and the Governor on the results
of the verification requirements under this subchapter.


































03/24/2025 10:12:32 AM CRH308